Utah statutes.
4-16-10.   False or misleading advertising with respect to seed quality
prohibited.
Unless agricultural, vegetable, flower, or tree and shrub seeds or seeds for
sprouting sold, advertised, or exposed or offered for sale in this state for
propagation or planting have been registered or certified by an officially
recognized seed certifying agency approved and accredited in this state, a
person may not:
(1)  use orally or in writing:
(a)  the term "foundation," "registered," or "certified" seed along with other
words; or
(b)  any other term or form of words which suggests that the seed has been
certified or registered by an inspection agency duly authorized by any state,
or that there has been registration or certification, or either; or
(2)  use any tags similar to registration or certification tags.
